Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3714
State
Visitors Promotion Cash Fund; created; uses;
investment.

The State
Visitors Promotion Cash Fund is created. The commission shall use the proceeds
of the fund to
generally promote, encourage, and attract visitors to and within the State
of Nebraska and enhance the use of travel and tourism facilities within the
state. The proceeds of the fund shall
be in addition to funds appropriated to the commission from the General Fund. Any money in the State Visitors Promotion
Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 8;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1252;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 14.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.